Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.070

Actions against state officers, employees, volunteers, or foster parents—Defense by attorney general—Legal expenses.

If the attorney general shall find that said officer, employee, or volunteer's acts or omissions were, or were purported to be in good faith, within the scope of that person's official duties, or, in the case of a foster parent, that the occurrence arose from the good faith provision of foster care services, said request shall be granted, in which event the necessary expenses of the defense of said action or proceeding relating to a state officer, employee, or volunteer shall be paid as provided in RCW 4.92.130. In the case of a foster parent, necessary expenses of the defense shall be paid from the appropriations made for the support of the department to which such foster parent is attached. In such cases the attorney general shall appear and defend such officer, employee, volunteer, or foster parent, who shall assist and cooperate in the defense of such suit. However, the attorney general may not represent or provide private representation for a foster parent in an action or proceeding brought by the department of social and health services against that foster parent.

[ 1999 c 163 s 5; 1989 c 403 s 3; 1986 c 126 s 6; 1985 c 217 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 126 s 2; 1975 c 40 s 2; 1921 c 79 s 2; RRS s 890-2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 163: See note following RCW 4.92.130.

Findings—1989 c 403: See note following RCW 4.92.060.